Hawaii statutes.
[§661B-3]
Judgment and award. (a) The petitioner
shall have the burden to prove by a preponderance of the evidence:

(1) That the petitioner is eligible to seek
compensation in accordance with the requirements set forth in section 661B-1;

(2) That the petitioner was convicted in a court of
the State and subsequently imprisoned for one or more crimes, but the
petitioner was actually innocent of the crimes at issue; and

(3) That the petitioner served time in prison for the
crime or crimes, including time served prior to conviction, if any.

(b) The following
shall be affirmative defenses, on which the State shall have the burden of
proof by a preponderance of the evidence:

(1) The petitioner was serving a term of imprisonment
for another crime, including crimes under the laws of the United States, concurrently
with imprisonment for the crime or crimes for which petitioner was actually
innocent; provided that if the petitioner served additional time in prison due
to the conviction that is the basis of the petition, then the petitioner shall
receive compensation for that portion of the time served in prison during which
the petitioner was serving no other sentence;

(2) The petitioner committed perjury or fabricated
evidence or induced another person to commit perjury or fabricate evidence to
cause or bring about the conviction at issue;

(3) The petitioner fabricated evidence or committed
or suborned perjury during any proceeding related to the crime for which the petitioner
was convicted;

(4) The petitioner solicited the commission of the
crime at issue or any crime factually related to the crime at issue;

(5) The petitioner conspired to commit the crime at
issue or any crime factually related to the crime at issue;

(6) The petitioner attempted to commit the crime at
issue or any crime factually related to the crime at issue;

(7) The petitioner assisted in the commission of the
crime at issue or any crime factually related to the crime at issue; or

(8) The petitioner assisted any person to avoid apprehension,
arrest, or conviction for the crime at issue or any crime factually related to
the crime at issue.

If the State proves one or more of the affirmative
defenses enumerated in this subsection, the petitioner shall receive no
compensation except as provided in paragraph (1).

(c) If the court finds that the petitioner has
proven a claim for wrongful conviction and imprisonment, the court shall award
the petitioner $50,000 for each year of actual confinement, including time
spent awaiting trial, served by the petitioner for the crime or crimes for
which the petitioner was actually innocent; provided that:

(1) The petitioner shall not be compensated for the
time imprisoned if the petitioner was concurrently imprisoned for a different
conviction, even if the other conviction was related to the conviction that was
vacated or reversed or for which the petitioner was pardoned because of actual
innocence;

(2) The award shall be prorated for partial years of
imprisonment; and

(3) If the court finds, by a preponderance of the
evidence, extraordinary circumstances pertain to a conviction that is set aside
or a pardon that is granted because of actual innocence, the court may award the
petitioner a maximum of $100,000 in additional compensation.

(d) The court shall
award reasonable attorneys' fees not to exceed $10,000 for fees incurred in
preparing and prosecuting the claim for the prevailing petitioner. The
attorney for the petitioner shall not charge, demand, receive, or collect fees for
services rendered in excess of twenty-five per cent of any amount awarded by
the circuit court.

(e) In an action
under this chapter, court costs and fees as established by law may be allowed
to the prevailing party.

(f) On all moneys
awarded to the petitioner for claims instituted under this chapter, interest
shall be computed at the rate of four per cent a year from the date of judgment
up to, but not exceeding, thirty days after the date of approval of any
appropriation act providing for payment of the judgment.

(g) Any
moneys awarded to the petitioner for claims
instituted under this chapter, other than for attorneys' fees, shall not
be subject to any tax by the State or any county, including any income or
general excise tax, any law to the contrary notwithstanding. [L 2016, c 156, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next